Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Other Contracting Methods

Effective date. —

This part became effective July 1, 2021.

32-2-78.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Alternative contracting method” means a method of contracting authorized by Code Section 32-2-82.

“Construction manager/general contractor” means a person the department has selected to perform project delivery pursuant to Code Section 32-2-82.

“Participating local governing authority” includes the governing authority of any county or municipality whose geographical jurisdiction includes the project.

“Project” means an undertaking, including intermodal rail-related and multimodal transportation solutions, which the department deems appropriate for pursuing or letting based upon the authority granted in this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 10/SB 200; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 3/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 5/HB 577.

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “part” for “Code section and Code Sections 32-2-79 and 32-2-80” in the introductory language; added paragraphs (1) and (2); redesignated former paragraphs (1) and (2) as present paragraphs (3) and (4), respectively; and substituted the present provisions of paragraph (4) for the former provisions, which read: “‘Project’ means a project which the department deems appropriate for letting pursuant to the procedures of Code Section 32-2-79 and Code Section 32-2-80.” The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section

32-2-78

, concerning definitions, was based on Code 1981, §

32-2-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 905, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 902, § 1/SB 270, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 1/SB 200, effective May 11, 2009.

32-2-79.
Biennial reporting of potential undertakings best suited for public-private partnership.

At a minimum, the staff of the department shall jointly identify and report to the board by July 31 of each odd-numbered year those potential undertakings best suited for delivery under the procedures of Code Section 32-2-80 and that are expected to provide the greatest public benefit through enhanced public safety, enhanced mobility of goods, congestion mitigation, enhanced trade and economic development, improved air quality or land use, or reduction of public expenditures due to improved transportation efficiency or infrastructure preservation as aligned with the state-wide strategic transportation plan as defined in Code Section 32-2-41.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 10/SB 200; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 3/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 5/HB 577.

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section. The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section

32-2-79

, concerning requirements for solicited and unsolicited proposals for public-private initiative, was based on Code 1981, §

32-2-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 905, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 902, § 2/SB 270; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 32/SB 465, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 1/SB 200, effective May 11, 2009.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Governing public-private partnerships, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-17.

32-2-80.
Public-private partnerships (P3s).

The department shall evaluate a potential project to determine, in the judgment of the department, appropriate or desirable levels of state, local, and private participation in financing such project. In making such determination, the department shall be authorized and encouraged to seek the advice and input of the affected local governing authorities, applicable metropolitan planning organizations, and the private financial and construction sectors.

No constitutional officer or member of the board shall serve as an agent, lobbyist, or board member for any entity directly or indirectly under contract with or negotiating a contract with the department under this Code section for one year after leaving his or her position as a constitutional officer or member of the board.

For projects that are funded or financed in part or in whole by private sources, the department shall be authorized to issue a written request for proposal indicating in general terms the scope of the project, the proposed financial participations in the project, and the factors that will be used in evaluating the proposal and containing or incorporating by reference other applicable contractual terms and conditions, including any unique capabilities or qualifications that will be required of the contractor. Public notice of such request for proposal shall be made at least 90 days prior to the date set for receipt of proposals by posting the legal notice on a single website that shall be procured and maintained for such purposes by the Department of Administrative Services or in substantially the same manner utilized by the department to solicit requests for proposals.

For every project undertaken pursuant to this Code section, the department shall accept written public comment, solicited in the same manner as provided for in the request for proposal, for a period of 30 days beginning at least ten days after the public notice of the request for proposal is made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. In addition, the department shall hold at least one public hearing, which may be held by teleconference, not later than the conclusion of the period for public comment.

The department shall select two or more respondents deemed fully qualified, responsible, and suitable to engage for interview and discussion based upon responses on professional competence and ability to meet the level of private financial participation called for by the department. Multiple interviews shall be permissible. In the event that any local governing authority has agreed to consider financial participation in the project, a representative of such local governing authority, appointed by such local governing authority, may participate in such discussions and interviews. During this stage, the department may discuss estimates of total project costs, including, but not limited to, life cycle costing and nonbinding estimates of price for services. Proprietary information from competing respondents shall not be disclosed to the public or to competitors.

Upon conclusion of discussions described in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the department shall rank respondents on the basis of the evaluation criteria set forth in the request for proposal. The department shall select in the order of preference two or more respondents whose qualifications and proposed services are deemed most meritorious and shall conduct negotiations with those respondents. Negotiations conducted under this paragraph can include, but are not limited to, one-on-one meetings or requests for proposals.

Upon approval by the department, the commissioner shall select the respondent for project implementation based upon contract terms that are the most satisfactory and advantageous to the state and to the department based upon a thorough assessment of value and the ability of the final project’s characteristics to meet state strategic goals and investment policies as provided for by Code Section 32-2-41.1. Before making such selection, the commissioner shall consult with any participating local governing authority or authorities.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the terms and conditions for multiple awards are included in the request for proposal, the department may award contracts to more than one respondent. Should the department determine in writing and in its sole discretion that only one respondent is fully qualified, or that one respondent is clearly more highly qualified and suitable than the others under consideration, a contract may be negotiated and awarded to that respondent after the respondent is determined to be responsible.

Nothing in this Code section shall require the department to continue negotiations or discussions arising out of any request for proposal.

The department shall be authorized to promulgate reasonable rules or regulations to assist in proposal evaluations and to implement the purposes of this Code section. The department shall report the content of such rules or regulations to the Transportation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives for their approval by majority vote prior to the promulgation thereof and shall make quarterly reports to the same chairpersons of all of its activities undertaken pursuant to the provisions of this Code section.

Any contracts entered into pursuant to this Code section may authorize funding to include tolls, fares, or other user fees and tax increments for use of the project that is the subject of the proposal. Such funding may be distributed by contract among the participants in the project as may be provided for by contract. The department may take any action to obtain federal, state, or local assistance for a qualifying project that serves the public purpose of this Code section and may enter into any contracts required to receive such assistance. The department may determine that it serves the public purpose of this Code section for all or any portion of the costs of a qualifying project to be paid, directly or indirectly, from the proceeds of a grant or loan made by the federal, state, or local government or any instrumentality thereof. The department may agree to make grants or loans to the operator from time to time from amounts received from the federal, state, or local government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

The commissioner shall be authorized to delegate such duties and responsibilities under this Code section as he or she deems appropriate from time to time; provided, however, that the final approval of contracts provided for in this Code section shall be by action of the board.

The power of eminent domain shall not be delegated to any private entity with respect to any project commenced or proposed pursuant to this Code section.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this Code section shall require the private partner or each of its prime contractors to provide performance and payment security. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the penal sum or amount of such security may be less than the price of the contract involved, such as the value of the construction elements of the contract, based upon the department’s determination on a project-by-project basis of what sum may be required to adequately protect the department, the state, and the contracting and subcontracting parties.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 10/SB 200; Ga. L. 2020, p. 371, § 3/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 3/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 5/HB 577; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 32/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, deleted “paragraphs (1) through (10) of subsection (a) of” preceding “Code Section 32-2-41.1” in the seventh sentence of paragraph (a)(4).

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “board” for “State Transportation Board” near the middle and at the end of paragraph (a)(2) and at the end of subsection (f); inserted “potential” near the beginning of the first sentence of paragraph (a)(1); designated the existing provisions of paragraph (a)(1.1) as present paragraph (a)(2); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(2) through (a)(4) as present paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(3), respectively; in paragraph (b)(2), in the first sentence, substituted “For every project undertaken pursuant to this Code section” for “Upon receipt of a proposal or proposals responsive to the request for proposals” at the beginning, substituted “in the request for proposal” for “notice of proposals” in the middle, and substituted “public notice of the request for proposal is made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection” for “date set for receipt of proposals” at the end, and substituted “, which may be held by teleconference,” for “on such proposals” in the second sentence; in paragraph (b)(3), substituted “select two or more respondents deemed fully qualified, responsible, and suitable to engage for interview and discussion based upon responses” for “engage in individual discussions with two or more respondents deemed fully qualified, responsible, and suitable on the basis of initial responses and with emphasis” in the first sentence, substituted “Multiple” for “Repetitive informal” at the beginning of the second sentence, and substituted “During this” for “At the discussion” at the beginning of the fourth sentence; designated the sixth and seventh sentences of former paragraph (a)(4) as paragraph (b)(4), and rewrote; designated the eighth and ninth sentences of former paragraph (a)(4) as present paragraphs (b)(5) and (b)(6), respectively; added “after the respondent is determined to be responsible” at the end of paragraph (b)(6); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(5) and (a)(6) as present subsections (c) and (d), respectively; substituted “proposal evaluations” for “its evaluation of the proposal” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (d); redesignated former subsections (b) through (e) as present subsections (e) through (h), respectively; in subsection (h), substituted “entered into pursuant to this Code section” for “for a public-private partnership” near the beginning of the first sentence, and inserted “such as the value of the construction elements of the contract,” in the middle of the second sentence. The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes. The third 2021 amendment, effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “board” for “State Transportation Board” twice in paragraph (a)(1.1) (now paragraph (a)(2)).

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section

32-2-80

, concerning authority to contract with proposer for public-private initiative, was based on Code 1981, §

32-2-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 905, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 902, § 3/SB 270, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 1/SB 200, effective May 11, 2009.

32-2-81.
Design-build procedure.

As used in this Code section, the term “design-build procedure” means a method of contracting under which the department contracts with another party for the party to both design and build the structures, facilities, systems, and other items specified in the contract.

The department may use the design-build procedure for projects that include buildings, bridges and approaches, rail corridors, technology deployments, and limited or controlled access projects or projects that may be constructed within existing rights of way where the scope of work can be clearly defined or when a significant savings in project delivery time can be attained.

When the department determines that it is in the best interests of the public, the department may combine any or all of the environmental services, utility relocation services, right of way services, design services, and construction phases of a public road or other transportation purpose project into a single contract using a design-build procedure. Design-build contracts may be advertised and awarded notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Code Section 32-2-61; provided, however, that construction activities shall not begin on any portion of such projects until title to the necessary rights of way and easements for the construction of that portion of the project has vested in the state or a local governmental entity and all railroad crossing and utility agreements have been executed.

The department shall adopt by rule procedures for administering design-build contracts. Such procedures shall include, but not be limited to:

Prequalification requirements;

Public advertisement procedures;

Request for qualification requirements;

Request for proposal requirements;

Criteria for evaluating technical information and project costs;

Criteria for selection and award process, provided that the rules shall specify that the criteria for selection shall consist of the following minimum two components for any two-step procurement process:

A statement of qualifications from which the department will determine a list of qualified firms for the project, provided that, if the department determines it is in the state’s best interest, it may omit this requirement and move directly to a one-step procurement process through the issuance of a request for proposal from which the department may select the lowest qualified bidder; and

From the list of qualified firms as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a technical proposal and a price proposal from each firm from which the department shall select the lowest qualified bidder or, in the event the department uses the best value procurement process, the request for proposal shall specify the requirements necessary for the selection of the best value proposer which shall include, at a minimum, a weighted cost component and a technical component. A proposal shall only be considered nonresponsive if it does not contain all the information and level of detail requested in the request for proposal. A proposal shall not be deemed to be nonresponsive solely on the basis of minor irregularities in the proposal that do not directly affect the ability to fairly evaluate the merits of the proposal. Notwithstanding the requirements of Code Section 36-91-21, under no circumstances shall the department use a “best and final offer” standard in awarding a contract in order to induce one proposer to bid against an offer of another proposer. The department may provide for a stipulated fee to be awarded to the short list of qualified proposers who provide a responsive, successful proposal. In consideration for paying the stipulated fee, the department may use any ideas or information contained in the proposals in connection with the contract awarded for the project, or in connection with a subsequent procurement, without obligation to pay any additional compensation to the unsuccessful proposers;

Identification of those projects that the department believes are candidates for design-build contracting; and

Criteria for resolution of contract issues. The department may adopt a method for resolving issues and disputes through negotiations at the project level by the program manager up to and including a dispute review board procedure with final review by the commissioner or his or her designee. Regardless of the status or disposition of the issue or dispute, the design-builder and the department shall continue to perform their contractual responsibilities. The department shall have the authority to suspend or provide for the suspension of Section 108 of the department’s standard specifications pending final resolution of such contract issues and disputes. This paragraph shall not prevent an aggrieved party from seeking judicial review.

In contracting for design-build projects, the department shall be limited to contracting for no more than 50 percent of the total amount of construction projects awarded in the previous fiscal year.

Not later than 90 days after the end of the fiscal year, the department shall provide to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and chairpersons of the House and Senate Transportation Committees a summary containing all the projects awarded during the fiscal year using the design-build contracting method. Included in the report shall be an explanation for projects awarded to other than the low-bid proposal. This report shall be made available for public information.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 905, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 950, § 1/HB 530; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 32/SB 46; Ga. L. 2010, p. 396, § 1/SB 305; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 4/HB 817; Ga. L. 2013, p. 68, § 1/SB 70; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 3/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 5/HB 577.

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “projects that include” near the middle of subsection (b); substituted “Code Section 32-2-61; provided, however, that” for “Code Section 32-2-61. However,” at the end of the second sentence of subsection (c); and substituted “low-bid proposal” for “low bid proposal” near the end of the second sentence in subsection (f). The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes.

32-2-82.
Alternative contracting method.

The department shall be authorized to utilize an alternative contracting method for project delivery that includes one of the following:

An agreement in which a construction manager/general contractor performs two phases of work as follows:

The first phase, in which the construction manager/general contractor performs in the capacity of a construction manager, consisting of preconstruction services for a project which may be paid in lump sum, cost-plus fixed fee, cost per unit of work, specific rates of compensation, or other comparable payment method permitted by law; and

The second phase, in which the construction manager/general contractor performs in the capacity of a general contractor, consisting of construction services for a project that may be performed under the same contract as that of the first phase, subject to agreement by the department as to the terms for payment for such services and using any method of payment permitted by law; provided that the construction manager/general contractor self-performs at least 30 percent of the total original price for construction work on the project;

A predevelopment agreement, pursuant to which one or more contractors collaborate with the department on one or more projects:

For the conceptual, preliminary, and final planning for such projects, which may include predevelopment services, financial planning, environmental studies, engineering, and assistance with public outreach; and

To perform, at the department’s election, the construction work for any such project, subject to agreement as to the basis of payment for construction services; or

A comprehensive development agreement that allows for expedited project delivery through the concurrent design and construction of a project under a single multiphase contract, pursuant to which a contractor shall:

Collaborate with the department to advance development of the project concept;

Perform both the design and construction services; and

Perform any operations or maintenance work required for the project.

The department shall consider at least the following factors in assessing a project’s suitability and feasibility for delivery through an alternative contracting method: public interest, innovation, risk, design complexity, cost control, and construction schedule optimization.

When the department determines, in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section, that the public interest is best served by delivering the project utilizing an alternative contracting method, the department shall submit to the board a written request to proceed in delivering a project using an alternative contracting method. The department shall not proceed with the project using an alternative contracting method without prior approval by the board.

Upon approval of a request pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section, the department shall be authorized to issue a written solicitation identifying the scope of the project, the factors to be used to evaluate responses to the solicitation, and the basis for award of the contract to perform work on the project utilizing an alternative contracting method.

For any project for which an alternative contracting method is elected, the department shall utilize the procurement procedures under either Code Section 32-2-80 or 32-2-81 to competitively solicit proposals.

The department shall be authorized to utilize the alternative contracting method to deliver no more than two projects during any single fiscal year and no more than seven projects over a single ten-year period. Solely as it relates to a project delivered using an alternative contracting method under this Code section, the department shall not encumber in any one fiscal year an amount greater than 5 percent of the department’s capital budget in the previous fiscal year.

Not later than 90 days after the end of a fiscal year in which the department has executed a contract to deliver a project using an alternative contracting method, the department shall provide to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and chairpersons of the House and Senate Transportation Committees a summary containing all contracts that utilized an alternative contracting method. This report shall be made available to the public.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

Not later than July 1, 2026, and then once every five years thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the members of the House and Senate Transportation Committees detailing all contracts executed to deliver a project using an alternative contracting method and the benefits of using an alternative contracting method compared with other contracting methods for review and consideration as to the effectiveness of this Code section and any necessary amendments.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 3/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 5/HB 577; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 32/HB 1428.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “ten-year” for “ten year” in the first sentence of subsection (f) and revised punctuation in subsection (i).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2021, “July 1, 2026” was substituted for “five years after the effective date of this Code section” near the beginning of subsection (i).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 3/HB 588 and Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 5/HB 577 both enacted identical versions of this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.